Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.060

Fees payable in advance—Exception.

The officers mentioned in this chapter except the county sheriff shall not, in any case, except for the state or county, perform any official services unless the fees prescribed therefor are paid in advance, and on such payment the officer must perform the services required. The county sheriff may allow payment to be made after official services have been performed as the sheriff deems appropriate. For every failure or refusal to perform official duty when the fees are tendered, the officer is liable on his or her official bond.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4016; 1981 c 194 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.18.060. Prior: 1890 p 315 s 39; RRS s 506.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 194: See note following RCW 36.18.040.